District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1207.10

Biennial audit; report of audit; annual report of operation.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 11, 31 DCR 2514
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 401, 43 DCR 2978
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2403, 47 DCR 6308
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2220.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2403 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).